dev/verbs2.dix
<dictionary>
   <alphabet>ԱԲԳԴԵԶԷԸԹԺԻԼԽԾԿՀՁՂՃՄՅՆՇՈՉՊՋՌՍՎՏՐՑՒՓՔՕՖաբգդեզէըթժիլխծկհձղճմյնշոչպջռսվտրցւփքօֆև՞՛</alphabet>
   <sdefs>
     <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
     <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
     <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
     <sdef n="post"   c="Postposition"/>
     <sdef n="abbr"   c="Abbreviation"/>
     <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
     <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
     <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
     <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>
     <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
     <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
     <sdef n="rel"    c="Relative"/>
     <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
     <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
     <sdef n="vbser"  c="Verb 'to be'"/>
     <sdef n="vaux"   c="Auxiliary verb"/>
     <sdef n="tv"     c="Transitive"/>
     <sdef n="iv"     c="Intransitive"/>
     <sdef n="aa"     c="Animate"/>
     <sdef n="nn"     c="Inanimate"/>
     <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
     <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
     <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
     <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
     <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
     <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
     <sdef n="loc"    c="Locative"/>
     <sdef n="abl"    c="Ablative"/>
     <sdef n="ins"    c="Instrumental"/>
     <sdef n="subst"  c="Substantivised"/>
     <sdef n="px1sg"  c="Possessive first person singular"/>
     <sdef n="px2sg"  c="Possessive second person singular"/>
     <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>
     <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
     <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
     <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>
     <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
     <sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
     <sdef n="cog"    c="Cognomen"/>
     <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/>
     <sdef n="pass"   c="Passive"/>
     <sdef n="caus"   c="Causative"/>
     <sdef n="pprs"   c="Present participle"/>
     <sdef n="proc"   c="Process participle"/>
     <sdef n="pprf"     c="Perfective participle"/>
     <sdef n="prsl"   c="Resultative participle"/>
     <sdef n="pagn"   c="Subject participle"/>
     <sdef n="conneg"   c="Negative participle"/>
     <sdef n="fut1"   c="Future participle I"/>
     <sdef n="fut2"   c="Future participle II"/>
     <sdef n="pres"   c="Present"/>
     <sdef n="pii"    c="Imperfect"/>
     <sdef n="aor"    c="Aorist"/>
     <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
     <sdef n="fts"    c="Future subjunctive"/>
     <sdef n="ftp"    c="Future perfect"/>
     <sdef n="cnf"    c="Conditional future"/>
     <sdef n="cnp"    c="Conditional future perfect"/>
     <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine / Feminine"/>
     <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>
     <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
     <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
     <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>
     <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
     <sdef n="ord"    c="Ordinal"/>
     <sdef n="pers"   c="Personal"/>
     <sdef n="emph"   c="Emphatic"/>
     <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
     <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
     <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>
     <sdef n="sint"   c="Synthetic"/>
     <sdef n="pst"    c="Positive"/>
     <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>
     <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlative"/>
     <sdef n="cm"     c="Comma"/>
     <sdef n="apos"   c="Apostrophe"/>
     <sdef n="guio"   c="Hyphen"/>
     <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/>
   </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- ====================================================================== -->
    <!--                         P R E F I X E S                                --> 
    <!-- ====================================================================== -->

    <pardef n="neg">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>չ</l><r>չ<s n="adv"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ====================================================================== -->
    <!--                P E R S O N A L  ·  E N D I N G S                       --> 
    <!-- ====================================================================== -->


    <pardef n="n-aor-el-fin"> 
      <e><p><l>եցի</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եցիր</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եց</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եցինք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եցիք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եցին</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!--<e r="LR"><p><l>ի</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>-->
      <!--<e r="LR"><p><l>իր</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>-->
      <!--<e r="LR"><p><l>ինք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>-->
      <!--<e r="LR"><p><l>իք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>-->
      <!--<e r="LR"><p><l>ին</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-aor-al-fin">
      <e><p><l>ա</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ար</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ավ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>անք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>աք</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ան</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="x-pres-el-fin">
      <e><p><l>եմ</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ես</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ի</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ենք</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եք</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>են</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="x-pres-el-fin-p">
      <e><p><l>եի</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եիր</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եր</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եինք</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եիք</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>եին</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="x-pres-al-fin">
      <e><p><l>ամ</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>աս</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ա</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>անք</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>աք</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ն</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="x-pres-al-fin-p">
      <e><p><l>այի</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>այիր</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ար</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>այինք</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>այիք</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ային</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ====================================================================== -->
    <!--                    F I N I T E  ·  E N D I N G S                       --> 
    <!-- ====================================================================== -->

    <pardef n="n-pres-al-fin">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ftp"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-al-fin-p"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c-pres-al-fin">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnp"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-al-fin-p"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnf"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-al-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-pres-el-fin">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ftp"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-el-fin-p"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="x-pres-el-fin"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="աճել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>աճ</l><r>աճել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="այցելել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>այցել</l><r>այցելել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ապստամբել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ապստամբ</l><r>ապստամբել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="արբել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>արբեցնցն</l><r>արբել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="բանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>բան</l><r>բանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="բուսանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>բուսան</l><r>բուսանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="գուշակել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>գուշակ</l><r>գուշակել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="զարդարել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>զարդար</l><r>զարդարել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ընգնել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ընգն</l><r>ընգնել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թաքնվել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>թաքնվ</l><r>թաքնվել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="թռչել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>թռչ</l><r>թռչել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="լռել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>լռեցնցն</l><r>լռել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="խնչել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>խնչեցնցն</l><r>խնչել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ծիծաղել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ծիծաղ</l><r>ծիծաղել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="կատաղել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>կատաղ</l><r>կատաղել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="կոճկել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>կոճկ</l><r>կոճկել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="կտրել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>կտր</l><r>կտրել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="համարել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>համար</l><r>համարել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հանգչել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հանգչ</l><r>հանգչել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հարգել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հարգ</l><r>հարգել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="հորանջել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հորանջ</l><r>հորանջել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ճեմել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ճեմ</l><r>ճեմել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="միզել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>միզ</l><r>միզել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="նախաճաշել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>նախաճաշ</l><r>նախաճաշել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="շիջուցանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>շիջուցան</l><r>շիջուցանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="ուզել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ուզ</l><r>ուզել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="չորացնել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>չորացն</l><r>չորացնել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="պապանձել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>պապանձ</l><r>պապանձել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սազել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>սազեցնցն</l><r>սազել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="սիկտիրվել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>սիկտիրվ</l><r>սիկտիրվել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="վիճել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>վիճ</l><r>վիճել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="փտել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>փտ</l><r>փտել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-el"/></e>
    <e lm="արբենել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>արբեն</l><r>արբենել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="գոլանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>գոլան</l><r>գոլանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="զգել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>զգ</l><r>զգել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="լողել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>լող</l><r>լողել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="կամենել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>կամեն</l><r>կամենել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="հասկանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>հասկանացնցն</l><r>հասկանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="մերկանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>մերկանացնցն</l><r>մերկանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="որբանել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>որբանացնցն</l><r>որբանել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-caus-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="սորել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>սոր</l><r>սորել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
    <e lm="ցնծել"><par n="neg"/><p><l>ցնծ</l><r>ցնծել</r></p><par n="n-v-iv-pres-al"/></e>
